Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-211 Content of policies in general.
(a) A policy shall specify:

(1) The names of the parties to the contract. The
insurer's name shall be clearly shown in the policy;

(2) The subject of the insurance;

(3) The risks insured against and the amount of
insurance;

(4) The time at which the insurance under the policy
takes effect, and the period during which the insurance is to continue or the
method of determining the period;

(5) A statement of the premium or premium rate; and

(6) The conditions pertaining to the insurance.

(b) If under the contract the exact amount of
premiums is determinable only at termination of the contract or at periodic
intervals of the contract, a statement of the basis and rates upon which the
final premium is to be determined and paid shall be furnished any policy
examining bureau having jurisdiction or to the insured upon request.

(c) This section shall not apply to surety
insurance or to group insurance contracts. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next